New York, session 2025-2026, A3497.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section section 155.30 of the penal law, 2 as added by section 1 of part FF of chapter 55 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended and a new subdivision 13 is added to read as follows: 4 12. The property consists of retail goods or merchandise stolen pursu- 5 ant to a common scheme or plan or a single, ongoing intent to deprive 6 another or others of the property or to appropriate the property to the 7 actor or another person and the value of the property exceeds one thou- 8 sand dollars, which value may be determined by the aggregate value of 9 all such property regardless of whether the goods or merchandise were 10 stolen from the same owner. Nothing in this subdivision shall be read to 11 limit the ability to aggregate the value of any property or the ability 12 to charge the larceny of retail goods or merchandise under another 13 applicable provision of law[.]; or 14 13. The person has been previously convicted of petit larceny as 15 defined in section 155.25 of this article two times within any three 16 month period or three times within any twelve-month period. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06674-01-5